Washington statutes.
RCW 36.81.070

Notice of hearing on report.

The board shall fix a time and place for hearing the report of the engineer and cause notice thereof to be published once a week for two successive weeks in the county official newspaper and to be posted for at least twenty days at each termini of the proposed road.

The notice shall set forth the termini of the road as set out in the resolution of the board, or the freeholders' petition, as the case may be, and shall state that all persons interested may appear and be heard at such hearing upon the report and recommendation of the engineer either to proceed or not to proceed with establishing the road.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.81.070. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 22, part; RRS s 6450-22, part.]